apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <pardef n="/ਦੇ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l>ਦਿਆਂਗਾਂ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵਾਂਗੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵਾਂਗੀ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵਾਂਗੀਂ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵੇਗਾ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਓਗੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵੇਗੀ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਿਓਗੀ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵੇਗਾ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵੇਂਗੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵੇਗੀ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵੇਗੀਂ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਣਵਾਲਾ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਣਵਾਲੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਣਵਾਲੀਆਂ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਣਾ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਣੀ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਣ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵਾਂ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵੇਂ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੋ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੋ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵੇਂ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਵੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੋ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੋ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਿੰਦਾ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਿੰਦੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਿੰਦੀ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਿੰਦੀਆਂ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦੇਕਰ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਦੇਕੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਿੱਤਾ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਦਿਤਾ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਦਿੱਤੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਿੱਤੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਦਿੱਤੇ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਿੱਤੀ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਦਿੱਤੀਆਂ</l><r>ਦੇ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <e lm="ਦੇ"><i></i><par n="/ਦੇ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਦਲ ਦੇ"><i>ਬਦਲ<b/></i><par n="/ਦੇ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਨਮਾਨ ਦੇ"><i>ਸਨਮਾਨ<b/></i><par n="/ਦੇ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਧਿਆਨ ਦੇ"><i>ਧਿਆਨ<b/></i><par n="/ਦੇ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸ਼ਹੀਦ ਦੇ"><i>ਸ਼ਹੀਦ<b/></i><par n="/ਦੇ__vblex_tv"/></e>
